Maryland, session 2026, SB0579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
9–115.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “RETIRED VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS A RETIRED FIREFIGHTER WHO:
(I) VOLUNTEERED WITH A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY IN A
COUNTY;
(II) WAS ACTIVELY INVOLVED IN FIRE SUPPRESSION WHILE
VOLUNTEERING WITH THE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 319 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) HAS RECEIVED BENEFITS UNDER A LENGTH OF SERVICE
AWARD PROGRAM FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS COMPLETED A MINIMUM OF 3 YEARS OF
VOLUNTEER SERVICE; AND
(IV) ACCUMULATED AT LEAST 50 POINTS UNDER A LENGTH OF
SERVICE AWARD PROGRAM OR A POINT SYSTEM ESTABLISHED IN LIEU OF A LENGTH
OF SERVICE AWARD PROGRAM.
(2) (3) “VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY” INCLUDES A VOLUNTEER
FIRE DEPARTMENT.
(3) (4) “VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
A FIREFIGHTER ACTIVELY INVOLVED IN FIRE SUPPRESSION AND VOLUNTEERING
WITH A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY IN A COUNTY.
(B) (1) EACH COUNTY IN WHICH A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY IS
LOCATED SHALL OFFER NO–COST PREVENTIVE CANCER SCREENINGS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE LATEST SCREENING GUIDELINES ISSUED BY THE
INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF FIRE FIGHTERS TO EACH VOLUNTEER
FIREFIGHTER WHO VOLUNTEERS AND EACH RETIRED VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER
WHO VOLUNTEERED WITH THE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY.
(2) EACH VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY SHALL:
(I) MAINTAIN AN UP–TO–DATE LIST OF VOLUNTEER
FIREFIGHTERS WHO ARE VOLUNTEERING AND RETIRED VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
WHO VOLUNTEERED WITH THE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE LIST TO THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY IS LOCATED:
1. ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR; AND
2. ON REQUEST OF THE COUNTY.
(3) EACH COUNTY IN WHICH A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY IS
LOCATED SHALL MAINTAIN A LIST OF ALL VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS WHO
VOLUNTEER AND ALL RETIRED VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS WHO VOLUNTEERED IN
THE COUNTY AS PROVIDED BY EACH VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY LOCATED IN THE
COUNTY UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) A COUNTY MAY SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF
THIS SECTION BY:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 319
(1) PROVIDING A NO–COST ANNUAL EXAMINATION TO VOLUNTEER
FIREFIGHTERS AND RETIRED VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS THAT INCLUDES
PREVENTIVE CANCER SCREENINGS FOR FIREFIGHTERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
LATEST SCREENING GUIDELINES ISSUED BY THE INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF
FIRE FIGHTERS; OR
(2) APPLYING FOR A GRANT UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 40 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE TO PAY FOR INNOVATIVE CANCER SCREENING
TECHNOLOGIES, INCLUDING A MULTICANCER EARLY DETECTION BLOOD TEST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –